Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2350.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 6, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-911, to read: START_STATUTE23-911. Exemption for rural fire districts; volunteer firefighters A rural fire district is exempt from providing workers' compensation to volunteer firefighters.END_STATUTE